Utah statutes.
16-11-2.   Definitions.
As used in this chapter:
(1)  "Filed" means the division has received and approved, as to form, a
document submitted under the provisions of this chapter, and has marked on the
face of the document a stamp or seal indicating the time of day and date of
approval, the name of the division, the division director's signature and
division seal, or facsimiles of the signature or seal.
(2)  "Professional corporation" means a corporation organized under this
chapter.
(3)  "Professional service" means the personal service rendered by:
(a)  a physician, surgeon, or doctor of medicine holding a license under Title
58, Chapter 67, Utah Medical Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of medicine;
(b)  a doctor of dentistry holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 69,
Dentist and Dental Hygienist Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of dentistry;
(c)  an osteopathic physician or surgeon holding a license under Title 58,
Chapter 68, Utah Osteopathic Medical Practice Act, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of osteopathy;
(d)  a chiropractor holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 73, Chiropractic
Physician Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
chiropractic;
(e)  a podiatric physician holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 5a,
Podiatric Physician Licensing Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the
practice of podiatry;
(f)  an optometrist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 16a, Utah
Optometry Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
optometry;
(g)  a veterinarian holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 28, Veterinary
Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of veterinary
medicine;
(h)  an architect holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 3a, Architects
Licensing Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
architecture;
(i)  a public accountant holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 26a,
Certified Public Accountant Licensing Act, and any subsequent laws regulating
the practice of public accounting;
(j)  a naturopath holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 71, Naturopathic
Physician Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of
naturopathy;
(k)  a pharmacist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 17b, Pharmacy
Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of pharmacy;
(l)  an attorney granted the authority to practice law by:
(i)  the Utah Supreme Court; or
(ii)  the Supreme Court, other court, agency, instrumentality, or regulating
board that licenses or regulates the authority to practice law in any state or
territory of the United States other than Utah;
(m)  a professional engineer registered under Title 58, Chapter 22,
Professional Engineers and Professional Land Surveyors Licensing Act;
(n)  a real estate broker or real estate agent holding a license under Title
61, Chapter 2, Division of Real Estate, and any subsequent laws regulating the
selling, exchanging, purchasing, renting, or leasing of real estate;
(o)  a psychologist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 61, Psychologist
Licensing Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice of psychology;
(p)  a clinical or certified social worker holding a license under Title 58,
Chapter 60, Part 2, Social Worker Licensing Act, and any subsequent laws
regulating the practice of social work;
(q)  a physical therapist holding a license under Title 58, Chapter 24b,
Physical Therapy Practice Act, and any subsequent laws regulating the practice
of physical therapy;
(r)  a nurse licensed under Title 58, Chapter 31b, Nurse Practice Act, or
Title 58, Chapter 44a, Nurse Midwife Practice Act; or
(s)  a landscape architect licensed under Title 58, Chapter 53, Landscape
Architects Licensing Act, and any subsequent laws regulating landscape
architects.
(4)  "Regulating board" means the board that is charged with the licensing and
regulation of the practice of the profession which the professional
corporation is organized to render.  The definitions of Title 16, Chapter 10a,
Utah Revised Business Corporation Act, apply to this chapter unless the
context clearly indicates that a different meaning is intended.
